Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.25.610.
[Renumbered as AS 10.25.810.]

Sec. 10.25.620.
[Renumbered as AS 10.25.820.]

Sec. 10.25.630.
[Renumbered as AS 10.25.830.]

Sec. 10.25.640.
[Renumbered as AS 10.25.840.]

Sec. 10.25.650.
[Renumbered as AS 10.25.850.]

Sec. 10.25.810.
Purpose.

Cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporations may be organized under this chapter for the purpose of supplying electric energy or telephone or related telecommunications service and promoting and extending the use of these services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 18 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.25.610

.
Renumbered in 2012.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, added “or related telecommunications” following “electric energy or telephone”.

Sec. 10.25.820.
Chapter extended to existing cooperatives.

This chapter applies to all nonprofit cooperatives organized under any other law of the state for the purpose of supplying electric energy and power, or telephone or related telecommunications service, to its members, or for the purpose of promoting and extending the use of electric energy and power or telephone or related telecommunications service. These cooperatives are subject to this chapter as if originally organized under it.

History.

(§ 36 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 19 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.25.620

.
Renumbered in 2012.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020 added “or related telecommunications” twice following “or telephone” and made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although there is no other express language in the Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act, AS 10.25, which purports to make it the exclusive means of organizing nonprofit cooperative associations for the development of utility services, this would certainly be a reasonable inference based upon this section and upon the exclusionary language of AS

10.20.005

, which eliminates the nonprofit corporation as an alternative.
June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

The legislature, in creating regional electrical authorities under AS 18.57, anticipated that they might supplant the function of municipal and cooperative utilities in many areas of the state.
June 7, 1976, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 10.25.830.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter is complete in itself and is controlling. The provisions of any other law of the state relating to the organization of a corporation, except as provided in this chapter, do not apply to a cooperative organized under this chapter.
The enumeration of an object, purpose, power, manner, method or thing does not exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things.

History.

(§ 35 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.25.630

. Renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 10.25.840.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“cooperative” means a corporation organized under this chapter or that becomes subject to this chapter in the manner provided in this chapter;

“person” means a natural person, firm, association, corporation, business trust, partnership, federal agency, state or political subdivision, or an agency of the state or political subdivision, or a body politic;

“presiding officer” means the presiding officer of the board of directors of the cooperative;

“related telecommunications service” means

the transmission and reception of messages, impressions, pictures, and signals by means of electricity, electromagnetic waves, or any other source of energy, force variations, or impulses, whether conveyed by cable, wire, radiated through space, or transmitted through other media; or

a service capable of electronically generating, acquiring, storing, transforming, processing, retrieving, utilizing, or making available information, through the use of broadband Internet access, data center services, information technology, or other technology services;

“telephone service” means communication service whereby voice communication through the use of electricity is the principal intended use, and includes all telephone lines, facilities, or systems used in the rendition of this service.

History.

(am § 10 ch 64 SLA 1959; § 3 ch 93 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 1 SLA 1961; am § 72 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 136 SLA 1982; am § 17 ch 99 SLA 1995; am § 20 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985, 1995, 2012, and 2020 to retain alphabetical order.

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective April 30, 2020, added (6) [now (5)].

Sec. 10.25.850.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Electric and Telephone Cooperative Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

10.25.650

. Renumbered in 2012.